District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.224

Transfers from former boards.

The personnel, records, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations and other funds which relate primarily to former boards shall be transferred to the boards established by this subchapter.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

History

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.224.

Prior Codifications